North Carolina, session 2025, SB583.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 3B.
"Leading Investments in Families and Foster Teens Act.
"§ 143B-146.30. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Leading Investments in Families and Foster
Teens Act."
"§ 143B-146.31. Definitions.
(a) The following definitions apply in this Part:
*S583-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Department. – The Department of Health and Human Services.
(2) Eligible recipient. – A high school participant, expectant or new mother
participant, survivor of a natural disaster, or young adult exiting foster care
participant, who meets the criteria to receive Program income payments under
the Program.
(3) High school participant. – A public school student who is in Grade 12 and is
a homeless child or youth, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
(4) Expectant or new mother participant. – A person who is pregnant or a person
who birthed a child and that child is under 18 months of age.
(5) Survivor of a natural disaster. – Individuals that are eligible to receive Federal
Emergency Management Agency Individual Assistance or FEMA individual
assistance funds.
(6) Young adult exiting foster care participant. – Anyone who was in foster care
after 14 years of age, who exited foster care after 16 years of age, and who has
not yet turned 27 years of age.
(7) Fund. – The LIFT Fund.
(8) Liaison. – A local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths
and unaccompanied youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii)
of Title 42 of the United States Code.
(9) LIFT. – Leading Investments in Families and Foster Teens.
(10) Program. – The Leading Investments in Families and Foster Teens (LIFT)
Program.
(11) Program income payment. – Cash payments of equal amounts issued monthly
to eligible recipients with the intention of stabilizing the eligible recipients'
financial security and to protect from emergency expenditures.
(12) Taxable year. – As defined in G.S. 105-153.3.
"§ 143B-146.32. Program.
There is established the Leading Investments in Families and Foster Teens Program is
established within the Department to support eligible recipients with Program income payments
for limited periods of time in accordance with the Program. Eligible recipients shall only receive
funds to the extent that the Program income payments do not conflict with federal law, eligibility
for other federal of State programs, or any necessary waivers or exemptions for State or federal
benefits that are jeopardized. Eligible recipients shall receive payments of one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) per month in accordance with the following schedule:
(1) High school participants shall receive Program income payments beginning
April 1 and continuing through to August 1 on the first business days of each
of those months. These payments begin on April 1, 2026, and continue
through April 1, 2035, during those months listed above.
(2) Young adults exiting foster care shall receive Program income payments
beginning April 1, 2026, through to April 1, 2035, on the first business day of
each month.
(3) Expectant or new mothers shall receive Program income payments beginning
April 1, 2026, through to April 1, 2035, on the first business day of each
month.
(4) Beginning April 1, 2026, through to April 1, 2035, survivors of a natural
disaster shall receive Program income payments the first business day of each
month for 12 months after qualifying for Federal Emergency Management
Agency Individual Assistance.
"§ 143B-146.33. Fund.
The LIFT Fund is hereby established within the Department as a nonreverting,
interest-bearing account to receive appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, donations, and any
Page 2 Senate Bill 583-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
other funds to support this Program. The Department shall administer the Fund. Interest earned
shall become part of the Fund. Monies in the Fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set
forth in this Part and shall not be diverted for other purposes.
"§ 143B-146.34. Agency coordination.
The Department shall coordinate with the Department of Public Instruction, the Division of
Social Services, the Division of Public Health, and the Department of Public Safety, Division of
Emergency Management, for the respective eligible recipients under the Program to distribute
Program income payments.
"§ 143B-146.35. Taxation of Program income payments.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, receipt of Program income payments
shall not be (i) considered taxable income for the purposes of State income taxes, (ii) considered
in calculating any State tax credits, (iii) used to offset any liabilities owed by an eligible recipient,
and (iv) affect income eligibility of the eligible recipient or the household of the eligible recipient
for any public assistance, benefits, or programs administered or funded by the State. To the extent
that this Program would create a conflict between receipt of Program income payments and the
federal program aid, the State agency shall seek to obtain federal exemptions or waivers
necessary, if available, in order to execute both programs fully for eligible recipients. The
Department may seek alternative payment methods for the Program through rulemaking, if
necessary, due to a federal program conflict."
SECTION 1.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 143B-146.35, as enacted by this act, is effective for taxes
imposed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. The remainder of this section
becomes effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 2.(a) Program. – Of the funds received by the State and appropriated to
the Department of Health and Human Services from the Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families (TANF) Block Grant, the Department shall allocate to the Division of Social Services
(Division) the recurring sum of one hundred sixty-one million six hundred thousand dollars
($161,600,000) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to implement the Healthy Start
NC Program (Program). In addition, there is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department the recurring sum of one hundred forty-six million three hundred thousand dollars
($146,300,000) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated to the Division of
Social Services for implementation of the Program. The purpose of the Program is to provide
nonrecurrent, short-term benefits in the form of prenatal and infant cash allowances to meet
pre- and post-birth needs of expecting mothers and babies.
SECTION 2.(b) Administration. – The Division shall develop detailed guidelines to
administer, and accomplish the purposes of, the Program. The Division, in administering the
Program, shall do all of the following:
(1) Study, and make any amendments necessary to, the TANF State plan,
including what was approved in Section 9J.1 of S.L. 2023-134, to implement
the Program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Division may modify the State plan to accomplish the purposes of this act. To
the extent the Division identifies State laws modified pursuant to the authority
provided in this subsection, the Division shall make recommendations to the
General Assembly for legislative changes needed.
(2) Define childbirth as a specific crisis situation and episode of need and take
other steps required to use TANF funds to provide nonrecurrent, short-term
benefits to families who give birth to a child. In so doing, the Division shall
follow the guidance from the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, Administration of Children and Families Office of Family
Assistance, for funding the Program in conformity with this section.
Senate Bill 583-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Adopt policies, including a compliant means-based test at the time of birth for
Program recipients (such as Medicaid or a percentage of the federal poverty
level), to identify needy families that can be supported with TANF Block
Grant dollars in a manner that will neither trigger time limits or work
requirements nor adversely affect entitlement to other State or federal aid. The
Division shall collect and review information relevant to the means-based
eligibility determination required by this section.
(4) Identify and partner with a nonprofit organization to administer the Program.
As a condition of partnering with the nonprofit organization, the Division shall
require that the organization (i) deliver programmatic funding to families as a
private gift below applicable federal maximums in such a way as to make it
non-taxable and protect, to the maximum extent possible, the receipt of other
social benefits and (ii) engage in fundraising efforts to spur the receipt of funds
donated through private philanthropy to expand the reach of the Program so
as to provide programmatic funding to families that do not qualify under
subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(5) Identify and report annually to the General Assembly on the number of
families receiving aid, broken down by those supported using TANF funds
and those supported using private funds, the total amount of private funds
raised through fundraising efforts, and additional needs or resources that
would assist the Division in maximizing private fundraising efforts.
SECTION 2.(c) Use. – Awards of programmatic funding shall be subject to all of
the following:
(1) A one-time award to an expecting mother during pregnancy in the amount of
one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for needs determined by the
mother, including food, prenatal care, rent, and other needs.
(2) A monthly award for the maximum amount of time permitted under federal
law to qualify as nonrecurrent, short-term benefits, not to exceed the first year
after giving birth to the mother in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500.00)
per month for needs of the baby determined by the mother, including formula,
diapers, child care, and other needs.
(3) Awards utilizing TANF funds shall use, and be limited by, the means-based
test provided in subdivision (b)(3) of this section, other applicable federal
restrictions, and this section to ensure the funds are used solely to benefit
eligible families.
(4) Awards utilizing funds raised by the nonprofit organization with which the
Division partners pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this section shall be used,
first, to augment awards for families that qualify for TANF funds under
subdivision (3) of this subsection to the maximum amount permitted by this
section and, thereafter, to beneficially impact as many other families as
possible; provided that, such awards shall not exceed the amounts and
purposes permitted in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 105-130.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-130.3. Corporations.
A tax is imposed on the State net income of every C Corporation doing business in this State.
An S Corporation is not subject to the tax levied in this section. The tax is a percentage equal to
two and one-quarter percent (2.25%) of the taxpayer's State net income computed as
follows:income.
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2025 2.25%
In 2026 2%
Page 4 Senate Bill 583-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
In 2028 1%
After 2029 0%."
SECTION 2.(e) Section 2(d) of this act is effective for taxable years beginning on
or after January 1, 2025. Section 2(a) through (c) of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 583-First Edition Page 5